pt-BR: Compatível com tubeless: Não compatível com tubeless; Tubeless e com câmara; Apenas tubeless; Outro
nl: Tubeless compatibel: Niet tubeless ready; Tubeless en met binnenband; Alleen tubeless; Anders
ja: チューブレス対応: チューブレス非対応; チューブレスおよびチューブド; チューブレス専用; その他
es: Compatible con sistemas sin cámara: No compatible con tubeless; Para tubeless y con cámara; Solo para tubeless; Otro
sk-SK: Kompatibilné s bezdušovými pneumatikami: Nekompatibilné s bezdušovým systémom; Bezdušové a dušové; Iba bezdušové; Iné
tr: Tubeless uyumlu: Tubeless uyumlu değil; Tubeless ve iç lastikli; Sadece tubeless; Diğer
de: Tubeless-kompatibel: Nicht Tubeless-kompatibel; Tubeless und mit Schlauch; Nur Tubeless; Sonstiges
ko: 튜브리스 호환 가능: 튜블리스 호환 불가; 튜블리스 및 튜브형; 튜블리스 전용; 기타
pl: Kompatybilność z systemem bezdętkowym: Niekompatybilne z systemem bezdętkowym; Bezdętkowe i dętkowe; Tylko bezdętkowe; Inne
hr-HR: Kompatibilno s tubeless gumama: Nije kompatibilno s tubeless sustavom; Tubeless i sa zračnicom; Samo tubeless; Ostalo
el: Συμβατότητα για χρήση χωρίς σαμπρέλα: Μη συμβατό με σύστημα χωρίς σαμπρέλα; Χωρίς σαμπρέλα και με σαμπρέλα; Μόνο χωρίς σαμπρέλα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 无内胎兼容: 不兼容真空胎; 真空胎和有内胎; 仅限真空胎; 其他
sl-SI: Združljivo s sistemom brez zračnice: Ni združljivo s sistemi brez zračnice; Brez zračnice in z zračnico; Samo brez zračnice; Drugo
vi: Tương thích với lốp không săm: Không tương thích lốp không săm; Không săm và có săm; Chỉ lốp không săm; Khác
lt-LT: Suderinamas su bekamerėmis padangomis: Nesuderinama su bekamerinėmis sistemomis; Bekamerinėms ir kamerinėms sistemoms; Tik bekamerinėms sistemoms; Kita
ro-RO: Compatibil fără cameră: Incompatibil cu tubeless; Tubeless și cu cameră; Doar tubeless; Altele
zh-TW: 無內胎相容: 不相容無內胎; 支援無內胎與有內胎; 僅限無內胎; 其他
cs: Kompatibilní s bezdušovými pneumatikami: Nekompatibilní s bezdušovým systémem; Bezdušové i dušové; Pouze bezdušové; Ostatní
hu: Belső gumi nélkül is használható: Nem tubeless kompatibilis; Tubeless és belső gumis; Csak tubeless; Egyéb
sv: Kompatibel med slanglöst: Ej tubeless-kompatibel; Tubeless och med slang; Endast tubeless; Annat
it: Compatibilità con tubeless: Non compatibile con tubeless; Tubeless e con camera d’aria; Solo tubeless; Altro
ru: Совместимость с бескамерными шинами: Не совместимо с бескамерными шинами; Бескамерные и с камерой; Только бескамерные; Другое
en: Tubeless compatible: Not tubeless compatible; Tubeless and tubed; Tubeless only; Other
pt-PT: Compatível com pneus sem tubos: Não compatível com tubeless; Com e sem câmara de ar; Apenas sem câmara de ar (tubeless); Outro
fi: Tubeless-yhteensopiva: Ei tubeless-yhteensopiva; Tubeless ja sisäkumi; Vain tubeless; Muu
bg-BG: Съвместимo с безкамерни гуми: Не е съвместимо с безкамерни гуми; За безкамерни и камерни гуми; Само за безкамерни гуми; Друго
fr: Compatibilité avec un montage sans chambre à air: Non compatible tubeless; Tubeless et avec chambre à air; Tubeless uniquement; Autre
da: Tubeless-kompatibel: Ikke tubeless-kompatibel; Tubeless og med slange; Kun tubeless; Andet
nb: Kompatibel med slangeløs: Ikke tubeless-kompatibel; Tubeless og med slange; Kun tubeless; Annet
th: รองรับระบบไร้ท่อ: ไม่รองรับ Tubeless; Tubeless และแบบมียางใน; Tubeless เท่านั้น; อื่นๆ